Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1498
Members of a nonelective governmental body or of a committee or subcommittee of a governmental body; no financial interest in matters before body; exception.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the majority of the members of a nonelective governmental body, or of a committee or subcommittee of a governmental body, whether that body is elective or not, shall not have a financial interest, either personally or through a member of their immediate family or a business with which they are associated, other than an interest of a de minimis nature or an interest that is not distinct from that of the general public, in matters subject to the jurisdiction of the body or committee or subcommittee.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 98.